District of Columbia statutes.
47-215

Publication of District expense estimates.

The annual estimates for expenses of the District of Columbia shall not be published in advance of their submission to Congress at the beginning of each regular session thereof.

History

Mar. 3, 1909, 35 Stat. 728, ch. 250, § 7
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Commission on the Arts and Humanities, budget submissions, see § 39-205.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-215.
1973 Ed., § 47-212.